Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1583YC (2) 91 cm/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 648.22, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 648.22 Judgment ââ execution ââ costs ââ sealing of court 3 records . 4 1. If the defendant is found guilty, judgment shall be 5 entered that the defendant be removed from the premises, and 6 that the plaintiff be put in possession of the premises, and an 7 execution for the defendantâs removal within three days from 8 the judgment shall issue accordingly, to which judgment for 9 costs shall be entered in the judgment docket and lien index, 10 and to which shall be added a clause commanding the officer to 11 collect the costs as in ordinary cases. 12 2. In a residential forcible entry and detainer action, 13 the court records of the action shall be sealed not later than 14 three days from the date of the order, if any of the following 15 occurs: 16 a. The defendant is found not guilty. 17 b. The case is dismissed. 18 c. The plaintiff does not appear for the hearing. 19 3. In a residential forcible entry and detainer action, the 20 court shall enter an order sealing the court records of the 21 action not later than three days from the date of the order 22 if, by motion or upon the courtâs own determination, the court 23 finds there is no genuine issue of material fact between the 24 parties. 25 4. Upon application of a defendant found guilty in a 26 residential forcible entry and detainer action for nonpayment 27 of rent, the court shall enter an order sealing the record of 28 the action, the existence of the petition, all filings and 29 documentation within the case file, and any associated writs of 30 execution, if all of the following conditions are met: 31 a. More than seven years have passed since the date of the 32 finding of guilt. 33 b. The applicant has not been found guilty in a subsequent 34 forcible entry and detainer action in the five-year period 35 -1- LSB 1583YC (2) 91 cm/jh 1/ 5 H.F. _____ directly preceding the application. 1 c. The applicant has not previously been granted a sealing 2 of a finding of guilt under this chapter within ten years prior 3 to the application. 4 d. The applicant has paid all court costs, fees, fines, and 5 any other financial obligation ordered by the court or assessed 6 by the clerk of the district court in the case. 7 5. The application to seal the record of the action shall be 8 included in the record the defendant wishes to seal, using a 9 form prescribed by the supreme court. 10 6. In a residential forcible entry and detainer action for 11 nonpayment of rent in which the defendant is found guilty, the 12 court shall enter an order sealing the record of the action, 13 the existence of the petition, all filings and documentation 14 within the case file, and any associated writs of execution, if 15 all of the following conditions are met: 16 a. The application is filed jointly by the plaintiff and 17 defendant. 18 b. The defendant applicant has paid all court costs, fees, 19 fines, and any other financial obligation ordered by the court 20 or assessed by the clerk of the district court in the case. 21 7. Upon sealing, the existence of the petition, all filings 22 and documentation within the case file, and any associated 23 writs of execution shall be removed from any publicly 24 accessible location under the direction of the judicial branch 25 or county, as applicable. The clerk of court shall enter 26 satisfaction of judgment in the judgment docket and lien index. 27 Notwithstanding chapter 22, records sealed upon satisfaction 28 of the requirements specified in this section shall not be 29 available for public inspection except in one of the following 30 manners: 31 a. Upon request by the defendant or the attorney for the 32 defendant by filing a motion in the sealed case. 33 b. Upon application to the judicial branch using a form 34 prescribed by the supreme court for scholarly, educational, 35 -2- LSB 1583YC (2) 91 cm/jh 2/ 5 H.F. _____ journalistic, or governmental purposes only, provided that in 1 all cases, the names of minor children shall remain sealed 2 at all times, and that the names and personally identifiable 3 information of all persons named as defendants or included in 4 the plaintiffâs petition shall be redacted and remain sealed 5 unless the court determines that release of such information is 6 necessary to fulfill the scholarly, educational, journalistic, 7 or governmental purpose of the request. 8 c. State court administration shall maintain a record in 9 the aggregate of all filings and the final disposition of any 10 such actions, to include dismissal, default judgment, and writs 11 associated with disposition. State court administration shall 12 make available to the public and report annually such aggregate 13 information in such a manner prescribed by the supreme court as 14 to protect the identity of the parties while still providing 15 the public with information regarding eviction proceedings. 16 8. Subsections 4 through 7 do not apply to a money judgment 17 awarded for an action that was filed with a forcible entry 18 and detainer action or arising from the same set of facts and 19 circumstances. 20 9. Subsections 3 through 7 do not create an independent 21 cause of action by a tenant for use of lawfully obtained 22 information. 23 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026. 24